tests/verbs-test-2.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 18) iv.aa p3.pl":
    mahtaws<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : mahtawsuwak
    maxkil<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : maxkileyok
    tolhukwen<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : tolhukweniyok
    tolemuxw<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : tolemuxweneyo
    ohelemamehel<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ohelemameleyok
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) iv.aa p1":
    takohkat<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntakohkata
    nisksit<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nisksita
    pimtelinkw<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpimtelinkwa
    wetemalis<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newetamamalisi
    ohelemakil<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nohelemakil

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) iv.aa p1":
    payaxkh<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpayaxkhasi
    kshik<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkeshiki
    aholuken<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntaholuken
    chipinakws<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nchipinakwsi
    welalew<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : newelalewa

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) iv.aa p2.sg":
    takohkat<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktakohkata
    nisksit<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kenisksita
    pimtelinkw<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpimtelinkwa
    wetemalis<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewetamamalisi
    ohelemakil<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kohelemakil

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) iv.aa p2.sg":
    payaxkh<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpayaxkhasi
    kshik<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshiki
    aholuken<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktaholuken
    chipinakws<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kchipinakwsi
    welalew<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kewelalaewa

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) iv.aa p3.sg":
    takohkat<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : takohkate
    nisksit<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : nisksite
    pimtelinkw<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : pimtelinkwe
    wetemalis<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : wetamamalisu
    ohelemakil<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : ohelemakil

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) iv.aa p3.sg":
    payaxkh<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : payaxkhasu
    kshik<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kshiki
    aholuken<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : aholuken
    chipinakws<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : chipinakwsu
    welalew<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : welalewe

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    takohkat<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntakohkatahena
    nisksit<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nisksitahena
    pimtelinkw<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpimtelinkwahena
    wetemalis<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : newetamamalisihena
    ohelemakil<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nohelemakilhena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    payaxkh<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpayaxkhasihena
    kshik<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkeshikihena
    aholuken<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntaholukenahena
    chipinakws<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nchipinakwsihena
    welalew<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : newelalewahena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    takohkat<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> :  ktakohkatahena
    nisksit<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kenisksitahena
    pimtelinkw<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpimtelinkwahena
    wetemalis<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kewetamamalisihena
    ohelemakil<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kohelemakilhena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    payaxkh<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> :  kpayaxkhasihena
    kshik<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : keshikihena
    aholuken<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktaholukenahena
    chipinakws<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kchipinakwsihena
    welalew<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kewelalewahena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) iv.aa p2.pl":
    takohkat<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktakohkatahemo
    nisksit<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kenisksitahemo
    pimtelinkw<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpimtelinkwahemo
    wetemalis<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> :  kewetamamalisihemo
    ohelemakil<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kohelemakilhemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) iv.aa p2.pl":
    payaxkh<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpayaxkhasihemo
    kshik<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : keshikihemo
    aholuken<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktaholukenahemo
    chipinakws<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kchipinakwsihemo
    welalew<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kewelalewahemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) iv.aa p3.pl":
    takohkats<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : takohkateyok
    nisksit<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : nisksiteyok
    pimtelinkw<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : pimtelinkweyok
    wetemalis<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : wetamamalisuwak
    ohelemakil<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : ohelemakileyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) iv.aa p3.pl":
    payaxkh<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : payaxkhasuwak
    kshik<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kshikiyok
    aholuken<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : aholukeneyok
    chipinakws<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : chipinakwsuwak
    welalew<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : welaleweyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) iv.aa p1":
    shenkixi<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nshenkixi
    kwenekat<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkwenekata
    kwenalew<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkwenalewa
    aspaluwexw<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntaspaluwexwa
    pechinkwehel<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpechinkwehela

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) iv.aa p1":
    peminehik<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpeminehika

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) iv.aa p2.sg":
    shenkixi<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kshenkixi
    kwenekat<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kwenekata
    kwenalew<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kwenalewa
    aspaluwexw<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktaspaluwexwa
    pechinkwehel<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpechinkwehela

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) iv.aa p2.sg":
    peminehik<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kpeminehika

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) iv.aa p3.sg":
    shenkixi<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : shenkixi
    kwenekat<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwenekate
    kwenalew<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kwenalewe
    aspaluwexw<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : aspaluwexwe
    pechinkwehel<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : pechinkwehele

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) iv.aa p3.sg":
    peminehik<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : peminehike

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    shenkixi<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nshenkixihena
    kwenekat<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkwenekatahena
    kwenalew<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : nkwenalewahena
    aspaluwexw<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ntaspaluwexwahena
    pechinkwehel<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpechinkwehelahena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    peminehik<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : mpeminehikahena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    shenkixi<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> :  kshenkixihena
    kwenekat<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kwenekatahena
    kwenalew<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kwenalewahena
    aspaluwexw<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ktaspaluwexwa
    pechinkwehel<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : kpechinkwehelahena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) iv.aa p1.incl.pl": 
    peminehik<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> :  kpeminehikahena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) iv.aa p2.pl":
    shenkixi<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kshenkixihemo
    kwenekat<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kwenekatahemo
    kwenalew<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kwenalewahemo
    aspaluwexw<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktaspaluwexwahemo
    pechinkwehel<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpechinkwehelahemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) iv.aa p2.pl":
    peminehik<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kpeminehikahemo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) iv.aa p3.pl":
    shenkixi<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : shenkixinuk
    kwenekat<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kwenekateyok
    kwenalew<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kwenaleweyok
    aspaluwexw<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : aspaluwexweyok
    pechinkwehel<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : pechninkweheleyok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) iv.aa p3.pl":
    peminehik<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : peminehikeyok
